Massachusetts, session 194th, S1191.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 208 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 34D the following section:-
Section 34E. In determining whether to make a judgment for either party to pay alimony
to the other under sections 48 to 55, inclusive, the court shall consider documented evidence of
abuse, as defined in chapter 209A, including, but not limited to, emotional distress resulting from
that abuse, between the parties or perpetrated by either party against either party’s child. For
purposes of this section, documented evidence shall include, but shall not be limited to, records
contained within the statewide domestic violence record keeping system. The court may consider
other evidence that it considers appropriate in determining whether there is a history of abuse
between the parties or perpetrated by either party against either party’s child. Whenever 1 party
of 2

has a criminal conviction resulting from abuse perpetrated against the other party or either
party’s child, a judgment for alimony to benefit the convicted party as a recipient shall be
prohibited.
SECTION 2. Section 53 of said chapter 208 is hereby amended by inserting after the
word “marriage”, in line 9, the following words:- “; documented evidence of a history of abuse,
as defined in chapter 209A, including, but not limited to, emotional distress resulting from that
abuse, between the parties or perpetrated by either party against either party’s child”.
SECTION 3. The payor spouse may petition the court to terminate an alimony judgment
entered into prior to the effective date of this act if the payor spouse presents a certified copy of a
court docket evidencing a conviction, as set forth in section 1 of this act, after all appeal periods
have been exhausted.
of 2